Idaho statutes. Title 39 HEALTH AND SAFETY
Chapter 2 VITAL STATISTICS
§ 39-259A. Voluntary adoption registry for providing limited access to birth information of adult adoptees.

The state registrar of vital statistics shall establish and maintain a confidential list of qualified adult adoptees who have presented a consent regarding the release of identifying information about themselves. Any consent by a qualified adult adoptee shall be accompanied by the adoptee’s desired method of notification in the event that a match occurs; however, the state shall not incur costs of notification in excess of that part of the fee charged to the applicant for the purpose of notification. Any consent shall also indicate whether the qualified adult adoptee desires release of his identifying information if a match occurs after his death. The qualified adult adoptee may revise his consent with respect to change of address or method of notification. Any name and accompanying information shall be removed from the list upon the verified written request of the listed adoptee. The registrar shall maintain a closed record of such list and accompanying information, except as provided in accordance with the provisions of this section.

The state registrar of vital statistics shall establish and maintain a confidential list of qualified birthparents who have presented a consent regarding the release of identifying information about themselves. Any consent by a qualified birthparent shall be accompanied by the birthparent’s desired method of notification in the event that a match occurs; however, the state shall not incur costs of notification in excess of that part of the fee charged to the applicant for the purpose of notification. Any consent shall also indicate whether the qualified birthparent desires release of his identifying information if a match occurs after his death. The qualified birthparent may revise his consent with respect to change of address or method of notification. Any name and accompanying information shall be removed from the list upon the verified written request of the listed birthparent. The registrar shall maintain a closed record of such list and accompanying information, except as provided in accordance with the provisions of section 39-258(h), and subsections (b), (c) and (d) of section 39-259, Idaho Code. Any birthparent who, in terminating his parental rights, used an alias and this alias is listed in the original sealed birth certificate, may also file a consent with the registry. A birthparent shall not be matched with a qualified adult adoptee without the consent of the other birthparent unless:

There is only one (1) birthparent listed on the birth certificate; or

The other birthparent is deceased; or

The other birthparent is unable to be located by the department of health and welfare or by a licensed child placement agency designated by the department of health and welfare, after a search, which shall consist, at a minimum, of a certified letter to the other birthparent at the last known address and a newspaper advertisement made in the county of the last known address; such search to be completed within ninety (90) days and the cost of said search to be fully funded and completed by the birthparent seeking a match; said search to be in accordance with the rules and regulations promulgated by the department.

The state registrar of vital statistics shall establish and maintain a confidential list of qualified adult birth siblings who have presented a consent regarding the release of identifying information about themselves. Any consent by a qualified birth sibling shall be accompanied by the birth sibling’s desired method of notification in the event that a match occurs; however, the state shall not incur costs of notification in excess of that part of the fee charged to the applicant for the purpose of notification. Any consent shall also indicate whether the qualified birth sibling desires release of his identifying information if a match occurs after his death. The qualified birth sibling may revise his consent with respect to change of address or method of notification. Any name and accompanying information shall be removed from the list upon the verified written request of the listed birth sibling. The registrar shall maintain a closed record of such list and accompanying information, except as provided in accordance with the provisions of sections 39-258(h) and 39-259(b), Idaho Code, and this section.

The state registrar shall maintain a confidential list of relatives of deceased qualified adult adoptees and relatives of deceased qualified birthparents who have presented a consent regarding the release of identifying information about themselves. Any consent by such relative shall be accompanied by the person’s desired method of notification in the event that a match occurs; however, the state shall not incur costs of notification in excess of that part of the fee charged to the applicant for the purpose of notification. Such relative may revise his consent with respect to change of address or method of notification. Any name and accompanying information shall be removed from the list upon the verified written request of the listed relative. The state registrar shall maintain a closed record of such list and accompanying information, except as provided in accordance with the provisions of this section.

The state registrar shall regularly review the lists provided for in subsections (a), (b), (c) and (d) of this section, and any other nonsealed administrative files or records within the office to determine if there is a match. If it appears that a match has occurred, then and only then is the registrar authorized to proceed to confirm the match through recourse to sealed documents on file in the office of the registrar. When a match is confirmed, the registrar shall notify each party, by its designated method only, prior to an exchange of identifying information. Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow any state or local governmental department, agency, or institution, or any employee thereof, to solicit any consent for the release of identifying information.

When a match is made and both the adopted person and the birthparent or parents, submit to the state registrar a notarized request for a copy of the original birth record of the adopted person, the state registrar shall issue such copy, marked “NOT FOR OFFICIAL USE”, at the usual cost of certificate copies.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow the registrar to issue a copy of the original birth certificate to any registrant, except as provided for in subsection (f) of this section.

Except upon order of a court of record of this state and notwithstanding any other provision of law, the information acquired by the registry shall not be disclosed under its public records law, sunshine or freedom of information legislation, rules or practice.

The initial fee to be charged each person requesting that his name be placed on the list provided for in subsections (a), (b), (c) and (d) of this section, and for the services provided by the registrar in establishing and implementing the registry pursuant to this section, shall be ten dollars ($10.00). Except for the cost of the search described in subsection (b)(3) of this section, the fee shall cover all direct and indirect costs incurred pursuant to this section. The state board of health and welfare shall annually review the fees and expenses incurred pursuant to this section and, as needed, adjust the fees charged to cover the expenses of administering the provisions of this section. History.

§ 39-260. Registration of deaths and stillbirths.

A certificate of each death which occurs in this state shall be filed with the local registrar of the district in which the death occurs, or as otherwise directed by the state registrar, within five (5) days after the occurrence. However, the board shall, by rule and upon such conditions as it may prescribe to assure compliance with the purposes of the vital statistics act, provide for the filing of death certificates without medical certifications of cause of death in cases in which compliance with the applicable prescribed period would result in undue hardship; but provided, however, that medical certifications of cause of death shall be provided by the certifying physician, physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse or coroner to the vital statistics unit within fifteen (15) days from the filing of the death certificate. No certificate shall be deemed complete until every item of information required shall have been provided or its omission satisfactorily accounted for. When death occurs in a moving conveyance in the United States and the body is first removed from the conveyance in this state, the death shall be registered in this state and the place where the body is first removed shall be considered the place of death. When a death occurs on a moving conveyance while in international airspace or in a foreign country or its airspace and the body is first removed from the conveyance in this state, the death shall be registered in this state but the certificate shall show the actual place of death insofar as can be determined. If the place of death is unknown but the dead body is found in this state, the certificate of death shall be completed and filed in accordance with this section. The place where the body is found shall be shown as the place of death. If the date of death is unknown, it shall be determined by approximation.

Personal data shall be supplied by the person best qualified to supply them; and

Except as otherwise provided, medical data shall be supplied by the physician, physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse who attended the deceased during the last illness, who shall certify to the cause of death according to his best knowledge, information and belief within seventy-two (72) hours from time of death. In the absence of the attending physician, physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse or with said person’s approval the certificate may be completed and signed by said person’s associate, who must be a physician, physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse, the chief medical officer of the institution in which death occurred, or the physician who performed an autopsy upon the decedent, provided such individual has access to the medical history of the case, views the deceased at or after death, and death is due to natural causes.
(2) The person in charge of interment or of removal of the body from the district shall refer the following cases to the coroner who shall make an immediate investigation, supply the necessary medical data, and certify to the cause of death:

The person in charge of interment or of removal of the body from the district shall refer the following cases to the coroner who shall make an immediate investigation, supply the necessary medical data, and certify to the cause of death:

When no physician, physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse was in attendance during the last illness of the deceased;

When the circumstances suggest that the death occurred as a result of other than natural causes; or

When death is due to natural causes and the physician, physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse who attended the deceased during the last illness or said person’s designated associate who must be a physician, physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse, is not available or is physically incapable of signing.

When a death is presumed to have occurred within this state but the body cannot be located, a death certificate may be prepared by the state registrar upon receipt of an order of a court of record of this state, which shall include the finding of facts required to complete the death certificate. Such a death certificate shall be marked “presumptive” and shall show on its face the date of registration and shall identify the court and the date of decree.

Each stillbirth, defined as a spontaneous fetal death of twenty (20) completed weeks gestation or more, based on a clinical estimate of gestation, or a weight of three hundred fifty (350) grams (twelve and thirty-five hundredths (12.35) ounces) or more, which occurs in this state shall be registered on a certificate of stillbirth within five (5) days after delivery with the local registrar of the district in which the stillbirth occurred. All induced terminations of pregnancy shall be reported in the manner prescribed in section 39-261, Idaho Code, and shall not be reported as stillbirths. No certificate shall be deemed complete until every item of information required shall have been provided or its omission satisfactorily accounted for.

When a stillbirth occurs in an institution, the person in charge of the institution or a designated representative shall prepare the certificate, obtain the signature of the physician, physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse in attendance, except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this section, who shall provide the medical data, and forward the certificate to the mortician or person acting as such. In the absence of the attending physician, physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse or with said person’s approval the certificate may be completed and signed by said person’s associate, who must be a physician, physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse, the chief medical officer of the institution in which the stillbirth occurred, or the physician who performed an autopsy on the stillborn fetus, provided such individual has access to the medical history of the case and views the fetus at or after stillbirth. The mortician or person acting as such shall provide the disposition information and file the certificate with the local registrar.

When a stillbirth occurs outside an institution, the mortician or person acting as such shall complete the certificate, obtain the medical data from and signature of the attendant at the stillbirth, except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this section, and file the certificate. If the attendant at or immediately after the stillbirth is not a physician, physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse, the coroner shall investigate and sign the certificate of stillbirth.

When a stillbirth occurs in a moving conveyance in the United States and the stillborn fetus is first removed from the conveyance in this state, the stillbirth shall be registered in this state and the place where the stillborn fetus is first removed shall be considered the place of stillbirth. When a stillbirth occurs in a moving conveyance while in international airspace or in a foreign country or its airspace and the stillborn fetus is first removed from the conveyance in this state, the stillbirth shall be registered in this state but the certificate shall show the actual place of stillbirth insofar as can be determined.

When a stillborn fetus is found in this state and the place of stillbirth is unknown, it shall be reported in this state. The place where the stillborn fetus was found shall be considered the place of stillbirth.

The name of the father shall be entered on the certificate of stillbirth as provided by section 39-255, Idaho Code.

The person responsible for the preparation or completion of the stillbirth certificate as stated in subsection (4)(a) and (b) of this section shall refer the following cases to the coroner who shall make an immediate investigation, supply the necessary medical data and certify to the cause of stillbirth:

When the circumstances suggest that the stillbirth occurred as a result of other than natural causes, excepting legally induced abortions, as defined by section 39-241, Idaho Code; or

When death is due to natural causes and the physician, physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse in attendance at or immediately after the stillbirth or said person’s designated associate is not available or is physically incapable of signing.

The person in charge of interment or of removal of the body from the district shall be responsible for obtaining and filing the certificate. Said person shall obtain the required information from the following persons, over their respective signatures:

§ 39-260A. Transportation of dead human bodies. [Repealed.]

§ 39-261. Induced abortion reporting forms — Compilations.

The vital statistics unit shall establish an induced abortion reporting form, which shall be used for the reporting of every induced abortion performed in this state. However, no information shall be collected which would identify the woman who had the abortion. Such form shall be prescribed by the department and shall include as a minimum the items required by the standard reporting form as recommended by the national center for health statistics, of the United States department of health and human services.

The department of health and welfare shall prepare and keep on permanent file compilations of the information submitted on the induced abortion reporting forms pursuant to such rules and regulations as established by the department of health and welfare, which compilations shall be a matter of public record.

The completed form shall be filed by the attending physician and sent to the vital statistics unit within fifteen (15) days after the end of each reporting month. The submitted form shall be an original, typed or written legibly in durable ink, and shall not be deemed complete until every item of information required shall have been provided or its omission satisfactorily accounted for. Carbon copies shall not be acceptable.

§ 39-262. Registration of marriage — Marriage certificates filed.

Every person who performs a marriage ceremony shall prepare and sign a certificate of marriage in duplicate, one (1) of which shall be given to the parties and the other filed by said person within ten (10) days after the ceremony with the county recorder. Every county recorder shall forward to the state registrar on or before the 15th day of each calendar month the certificates of marriage which were filed with said recorder during the preceding calendar month. The form of certificate of marriage shall be prescribed by the board, in accordance with the provisions of sections 32-401 and 32-402, Idaho Code. No certificate shall be deemed complete until every item of information required shall have been provided or its omission satisfactorily accounted for.

§ 39-263. Marriage license fees.

Every county recorder shall be paid a fee, to be established by regulations adopted by the board, for each marriage certificate recorded with said recorder and forwarded to the state registrar. The recording fee shall be as provided by section 31-3205, Idaho Code.

§ 39-264. Registration of persons authorized to perform marriage ceremony. [Repealed.]

§ 39-265. Registration of divorces — Annulments of marriage.

A certificate of each divorce or annulment granted by any court in this state shall be filed by the clerk of the court with the vital statistics unit and shall be registered if it has been completed and filed in accordance with this chapter. The certificate shall be prepared by the petitioner or the petitioner’s legal representative on a form furnished by the state registrar and shall be presented to the clerk of the court with the petition. In all cases the completed certificate shall be prerequisite to the granting of the final decree. No certificate shall be deemed complete until every item of information required shall have been provided or its omission satisfactorily accounted for.

Immediately after the decree becomes final, the certificate shall be forwarded by the clerk to the state registrar on the 15th day of the calendar month next succeeding.

§ 39-266. Fee for court clerk.

The clerk of the court shall be paid a fee for each certificate forwarded by the clerk to the state registrar in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and regulations of the board. Said fee to be collected as a part of the court costs and be assessed by the court according to law. Said fee to be established by regulations adopted by the board.

§ 39-267. Delayed registration.

Any certificate required to be filed under this chapter accepted for filing after the time prescribed by the board shall be filed in accordance with the minimum standards prescribed by the national agency in charge of vital statistics.

If a delayed certificate of birth is rejected under the provisions prescribed, a petition signed and sworn to by the petitioner may be filed with a court of competent jurisdiction for an order establishing a record of the date and place of birth and the parentage of the person whose birth is to be registered. An order entered following the procedure established in section 39-278, Idaho Code, shall be acceptable evidence for establishing a delayed certificate of birth in the vital statistics unit.

If a delayed certificate of death is rejected under the provisions prescribed, a petition signed and sworn to by the petitioner may be filed with a court of competent jurisdiction for an order establishing a record of the date and place of death. An order entered following the procedure established in section 39-278, Idaho Code, shall be acceptable evidence for establishing a delayed certificate of death.

§ 39-268. Authorization for final disposition.

The mortician or person acting as such who first assumes possession of a dead body or stillborn fetus shall make a written report to the registrar of the district in which death or stillbirth occurred or in which the body or stillborn fetus was found within twenty-four (24) hours after taking possession of the body or stillborn fetus, on a form prescribed and furnished by the state registrar and in accordance with rules promulgated by the board. Except as specified in subsection (2) of this section, the written report shall serve as permit to transport, bury or entomb the body or stillborn fetus within this state, provided that the mortician or person acting as such shall certify that the physician, physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse in charge of the patient’s care for the illness or condition which resulted in death or stillbirth has been contacted and has affirmatively stated that said physician, physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse or the designated associate according to section 39-260(1)(b) or (4)(a), Idaho Code, will sign the certificate of death or stillbirth.

The written report as specified in subsection (1) of this section shall not serve as a permit to:

Remove a body or stillborn fetus from this state;

Cremate the body or stillborn fetus; or

Make disposal or disposition of any body or stillborn fetus in any manner when inquiry is required under chapter 43, title 19, Idaho Code, or section 39-260(2) or (5), Idaho Code.

In accordance with the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, the mortician or person acting as such who first assumes possession of a dead body or stillborn fetus shall obtain an authorization for final disposition prior to final disposal or removal from the state of the body or stillborn fetus. The physician, physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse or coroner responsible for signing the death or stillbirth certificate shall authorize final disposition of the body or stillborn fetus, on a form prescribed and furnished by the state registrar. If the body is to be cremated, the coroner must also give additional authorization. In the case of stillbirths, the hospital may dispose of the stillborn fetus if the parent(s) so requests; authorization from the coroner is not necessary unless the coroner is responsible for signing the certificate of stillbirth.

When a dead body or stillborn fetus is transported into the state, a permit issued in accordance with the law of the state in which the death or stillbirth occurred or in which the body or stillborn fetus was found shall authorize the transportation and final disposition within the state of Idaho.

§ 39-269. Disinterment — Rules.

No body or stillborn fetus shall be disinterred within the state of Idaho except upon a permit granted by the state registrar of vital statistics. The forms of disinterment permits shall be prepared by the state registrar. Disinterment and removal must be done under the personal supervision of a licensed mortician, and only upon verified application of the person or persons having the highest authority under the provisions of section 54-1142, Idaho Code. Only such persons as are actually necessary shall be present. The coffin shall not be opened either at place of disinterment or place of destination, except special permit be issued by the state registrar. And in case of disinterment of bodies dead by reason of contagious and infectious diseases, as shown by the certificate of death given by the certifying physician or coroner, the sexton and all other persons engaged in such removal or being present shall immediately thereafter change and disinfect their clothing and properly disinfect their hands, head and face, provided, that such disinterment may also be governed by rules promulgated by the state board of health and welfare and a synopsis of the same shall be printed on the back of every permit. In case of any contagious and infectious disease where remains are to be shipped to points in other states, permission must first be obtained from the state health officer of such state. The state registrar may also issue a special disinterment permit for legal purposes. This permit for legal purposes shall be granted only upon application of a prosecuting attorney, the attorney general of this state, or the coroner of the county in which the body is interred, stating therein such facts which make it evident to the state registrar that the ends of justice require that disinterment be permitted. Such special disinterment for legal purposes shall be governed by rules promulgated by the state board of health and welfare and a synopsis of the same shall be printed on the back of every such special disinterment permit for legal purposes. Bodies in a receiving vault when prepared by a licensed mortician shall not be regarded as disinterred bodies until after the expiration of thirty (30) days.

§ 39-270. Disclosure of information.

Certificates and records in the custody of the state registrar shall be open to inspection subject to the provisions of this chapter and the rules of the board, the provisions of section 74-102, Idaho Code, to the contrary notwithstanding; and it shall be unlawful for any state or local official or employee under this chapter to disclose any data contained in the records, except as authorized by this chapter and the rules of the board.

A complete copy, or any part of a certificate, may be issued to any applicant who can show direct and tangible interest in the record for which he applies. A complete copy, or any part of a certificate, shall be issued upon request to a state, federal or local public agency for child support enforcement purposes pursuant to chapters 10, 11 and 12, title 7, Idaho Code, and sections 16-1628, 20-524, 32-710A and 56-203, Idaho Code, or for the purpose of investigation of fraud related to benefit payments. Subject to such provisions as the board may prescribe, data contained on records may be used by federal, state or municipal agencies for the purpose of verification of data.

As provided in chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code, data contained on records may be used for research, public health or statistical purposes. No lists of registration shall be compiled for public use.

The manner of keeping local records and the use thereof shall be prescribed by the board, in keeping with the provisions of this section.

When one hundred (100) years have elapsed after the date of birth, or fifty (50) years have elapsed after the date of death, stillbirth, marriage or divorce, the records of these events in the custody of the state registrar shall become public records and information shall be made available in accordance with chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code.

§ 39-271. Records of institutions.

Every person in charge of an institution, public or private, to which persons resort for treatment of diseases, confinements, or are committed by law, shall record all the personal and statistical particulars relative to those persons admitted or confined to their institutions that are required on the forms or the certificates prescribed by the board. The record shall be made by them at the time of admission of the patients and at such other times as may be required. The personal and statistical particulars and information shall be obtained from the individuals themselves, if it is practicable to do so, and when they can not be so obtained, they shall be secured in as complete a manner as possible from relatives, friends or other persons acquainted with the facts.

§ 39-272. Duties to provide information.

For the purposes of compilation of the vital record, any person having knowledge of the facts shall furnish to the state registrar such information as they may possess regarding any birth, death, stillbirth, marriage or divorce.

§ 39-273. Penalties.

The following acts, if committed unlawfully, purposely and with the intent to deceive, shall be felonies punishable by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) or imprisonment of not more than five (5) years, or both:

furnishing false or fraudulent information affecting any certificate, record or report required by this chapter; or

making, counterfeiting, altering, amending or mutilating of any certificate, record or report, or any certified copy of a certificate, record, or report authorized by this chapter; or

obtaining, possessing, using, selling, or furnishing, or attempting to obtain, possess, use, sell, or furnish, any certificate, record, or report, or certified copy of a certificate, record, or report, which has been unlawfully made, counterfeited, altered, amended, or mutilated; or

furnishing, selling or using any certificate, record or report, or any certified copy of a certificate, record or report, authorized by this chapter for the purpose of misrepresenting the age or identity of a person or misrepresenting the facts relating to a birth, death or adoption.

The following acts, if committed with knowledge, recklessness or with criminal negligence, shall be misdemeanors punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment of not more than one (1) year, or both:

except where a different penalty is provided by this section, violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter by the board; or

neglecting or refusing to perform any of the duties imposed pursuant to this chapter; or

transporting, accepting for transport, interring, or otherwise disposing of a dead body or stillborn fetus without a permit or other authorization issued in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

In addition to the other penalties herein prescribed, any employee or officer of the department who knowingly, recklessly or negligently discloses any information in violation of section 39-270, Idaho Code, shall be subject to immediate dismissal from employment.

In addition to any other sanction or penalty authorized by law, the registrar may hereby impose a fine which may not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each violation wherein a physician, hospital administrator or his designee, or other birth attendants, or coroner/deputy, or funeral director/mortician fails to sign a birth, or death or stillbirth certificate within fifteen (15) days of the death or within fifteen (15) days of the birth. Notice of intent to impose such fine must be given by the registrar to the alleged violator. Each day that a violation continues following the giving of the notice of intent may constitute a violation and the registrar may impose a fine which may not exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) per day. In determining the amount of any fine to be imposed for a violation, the registrar shall consider the following factors:

the gravity of the violation or extent to which the provisions of the applicable statute or rule were violated;

any action taken by the alleged violator to correct the violation or assure that the violation will not reoccur;

any previous violation.

§ 39-274. Evidentiary character of records and copies of records.

Any certificate filed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the regulations prescribed by the board, or any copy of such records or part thereof, duly certified by the state registrar, shall be prima facie evidence of the facts recited therein.

§ 39-275. Applicability.

The provisions of this chapter also apply to all certificates of birth, death, marriage, divorce, stillbirth, and reports of induced abortion previously received by the vital statistics unit and in the custody of the state registrar.

§ 39-276. Uniformity of interpretation.

This chapter shall be so construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the laws of those states which enact it.

§ 39-277. Autopsies for suspected Creutzfeldt-Jakob disease.

When an attending physician or hospital has reported to the department of health and welfare that Creutzfeldt-Jakob disease (CJD) or variant CJD is suspected in relation to a person’s death, the state epidemiologist, as designated pursuant to department rule, shall cause to be performed an autopsy of the body, provided a definitive diagnosis has not been made prior to death and provided further that the person or persons having the highest authority under the provisions of section 54-1142, Idaho Code, do not refuse the performance of such autopsy. The state epidemiologist, in ordering an autopsy pursuant to this section, shall require the person or entity performing the autopsy to report the findings of such autopsy to the department of health and welfare.

§ 39-278. Procedure for delayed registration or amendment of vital record.

Following exhaustion of any administrative procedures or remedies provided by this chapter or by department rule, if an applicant has been denied a request to amend a vital record as provided by section 39-250(5), Idaho Code, or because the item for which an amendment is sought has already been once administratively denied, or if a delayed registration is rejected, including as provided in section 39-267, Idaho Code, the applicant may petition a court of competent jurisdiction of this state for an order establishing the facts necessary to establish or amend a vital record as provided in this section.

The petition must be verified and must allege at least:

If the petition is for a delayed registration of birth:

That the person for whom the delayed certificate is requested was born in this state;

That the person’s birth is not registered in another state or country;

That a record for the person’s birth cannot be found in the state’s vital records;

That despite diligent efforts the petitioner was unable to obtain the information and evidentiary documents required for the creation and registration of a delayed certificate of birth;

That the state registrar has issued a final rejection of the application for a delayed certificate of birth; and

The following information:

The original full name and sex of the registrant;

The date of birth and place of birth, including the:

Facility;

City, town or location;

County; and

The full maiden name of the mother; and

The full name of the father, unless the registrant was born out of wedlock.

If the petition is for a delayed registration of death or stillbirth:

That the person for whom the delayed certificate is requested died in this state;

That the person’s death is not registered in another state or country;

That a record for the person’s death cannot be found in the state’s vital records;

That despite diligent efforts the petitioner was unable to obtain the information and evidentiary documents required for the creation and registration of a delayed certificate of death;

That the state registrar has issued a final rejection of the application for a delayed certificate of death; and

The following information:

The full name and sex of the deceased;

The date and place of death, including the:

Facility;

City, town or location;

County; and

For a stillbirth:
(A) The full maiden name of the mother; and

If the petition is for another amendment to a vital record, in a manner otherwise permitted by department rule:

The identity of the record registered with the state registrar and the item in the record the petitioner requests to be amended;

The change requested and the purpose of the amendment;

The rule under which the amendment is otherwise permitted; and

That the state registrar has issued a final rejection of the application for the requested amendment and the reason for the rejection.

The petitioner must attach all evidentiary documents presented to the registrar and the written final letter of denial or rejection from the registrar.

The petitioner must provide a complete copy of the petition, together with notice of the date, time and place of the hearing, by mailing a copy thereof at least fourteen (14) days before the time set for the hearing, by certified, registered or ordinary first class mail, to the state registrar at the address given in the written final letter of denial or rejection. The state registrar or an authorized representative may appear and present evidence at the hearing.

If the court finds from the evidence presented that:

The person for whom a delayed certificate of birth is requested was born in this state, it shall make findings as to:

The original full name and sex of the registrant;

The date of birth and place of birth, including the:

Facility;

City, town or location;

County; and

The full maiden name of the mother; and

The full name of the father, unless the registrant was born out of wedlock.

The person for whom a delayed certificate of death is requested died in this state, it shall make findings as to:

The full name and sex of the deceased; and

The date and place of death, including the:

Facility;

City, town or location; and

County.

The person requesting any other amendment to a vital record in a manner otherwise permitted by department rule has established the facts necessary for the amendment and the amendment is otherwise appropriate, it shall make an order amending the item in the vital record as requested.

The order of the court shall include a description of the evidence presented and the date of the court’s action.

The order of the court shall not alter the fees otherwise required by the registrar for the requested amendment, or the time frames otherwise provided for the registrar to administratively establish or make the amendment requested.

(B) The full name of the father, unless the mother was not married.

§ 39-279. Severability.

The provisions of this chapter are hereby declared to be severable, and if any provision of this chapter or the application of such provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason, such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of this chapter.